District of Columbia statutes.
50-1602

Comprehensive Bicycle Transportation and Safety Program.

(a)

There shall be established in the District of Columbia a Comprehensive Bicycle Transportation and Safety Program to promote the safe and convenient use of the bicycle as a means of transportation and recreation.

(b)

The scope of the program shall include, but not be limited to:

(1)

Planning and supporting road improvements for bicyclists, such as wide curb lanes, smooth shoulders, bicyclist-oriented signs and signals, and removal of hazards;

(2)

Improving access for bicyclists on the road network and on all modes of public transportation;

(3)

Monitoring construction and repair projects to ensure that no additional hazards or obstacles to bicyclists are created as the transportation system is built or rebuilt;

(4)

Assisting, organizing, and coordinating the planning, design, construction, improvement, repair, and maintenance of bicycle facilities, such as bicycle paths and bicycle lanes, both within and separate from the highway rights-of-way;

(5)

Promoting the installation of secure and convenient bicycle parking facilities;

(6)

Organizing safety education and training programs for young and adult bicyclists, as well as for motorists, to reduce bicycling accidents and foster safe use of bicycles; and

(7)

Promoting effective traffic law enforcement to protect the rights of all road users and to encourage good bicycling habits.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-179, § 3, 32 DCR 764
1981 Ed., § 40-1402.